Hawaii, session 2025, GM1264.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION 1. The purpose of this Act is to authorize county
2 police officers to enforce the statewide traffic code on all
3 public streets, roadways, and highways within the State.
4 SECTION 2. Chapter 291C, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
5 amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately
6 designated and to read as follows:
7 "§291C- County police officer authority. Each county
8 police officer may enforce this chapter for any violation of
9 this chapter that occurs on any federal, state, or county
10 street, roadway, or highway."
11 SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored.
12 SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2742 SB662 CDl SMA.docx 1

662
S.B. NO
S.D. 1
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 3rd day of June ,2025

S.B. No. 662, S.D. 1, H.D. 3, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
192

SB No. 662, SD1,HD3,CD1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives